Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.230

Report to governor.

The judges of the supreme court shall, on or before the first day of January in each year, report in writing to the governor such defects and omissions in the laws as they may believe to exist.

[ 1890 p 324 s 16; RRS s 11042.]

NOTES:

Annual report to governor: State Constitution Art. 4 s 25.

Court of appeals—Reporting defects or omissions in the laws: RCW 2.06.110.